Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SALISBURY BRIDGE IN MEEKER COUNTY.new text end new text begin $1,650,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society for one or more grants to Kingston Township, Forest City Township, or both, to plan and complete the rehabilitation of the Salisbury Bridge in Meeker County. new text end